test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-xosjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюн, хосетавэхэюн]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюд, хосетавэхэюд]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюда, хосетавэхэюда]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюни’, хосетавэхэюни’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюди’, хосетавэхэюди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюди’, хосетавэхэюди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюна”, хосетавэхэюна”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюда”, хосетавэхэюда”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [хосьтавэхэюдо’, хосетавэхэюдо’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [хосьтавын, хосетавын]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [хосьтавыд, хосетавыд]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [хосьтавыда, хосетавыда]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [хосьтавыни’, хосетавыни’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [хосьтавыди’, хосетавыди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [хосьтавыди’, хосетавыди’]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [хосьтавына”, хосетавына”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [хосьтавыда”, хосетавыда”]
     хось+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [хосьтавыдо’, хосетавыдо’]
